Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 25 Campaign Practices
§ 22-25-106.
Filing of campaign reports.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (g) and (j) of this section and in addition to other reports required by this subsection:

Every candidate, whether successful or not, shall file an itemized statement of contributions and expenditures at least seven (7) days but not more than fourteen (14) days before any primary, general or special election. Any contribution received or expenditure made after the statement has been filed, through the day of the election, whether a primary, general or special election, shall be filed as an amendment to the statement within ten (10) days after the election;

and (iii) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 1, § 2.

Reports under this subsection shall set forth the full and complete record of contributions including cash, goods or services and actual and promised expenditures, including all identifiable expenses as set forth in W.S.

22-25-103

. For purposes of this section, a contribution is reportable when it is known and in the possession of, or the service has been furnished to, the person or entity required to submit a statement of contributions and expenditures. The date of each contribution of one hundred dollars ($100.00) or more, any expenditure or obligation, the name of the person from whom received or to whom paid and the purpose of each expenditure or obligation shall be listed. All contributions under one hundred dollars ($100.00) shall be reported but need not be itemized. Should the accumulation of contributions from a person exceed the one hundred dollar ($100.00) threshold, all contributions from that person shall be itemized. Contributions, expenditures and obligations itemized in a statement filed by a political action committee, a candidate’s campaign committee or by a political party central committee need not be itemized in a candidate’s statement;

Statements under this subsection shall be filed with those officers as provided in W.S.

22-25-107

.

Reports of itemized statements of contributions and expenditures, and statements of termination shall be made with the appropriate filing officers specified under W.S.

22-25-107

and in accordance with the following:

Except as otherwise provided in this section, any political action committee and candidate’s campaign committee, or any political action committee formed under the law of another state that contributes to a Wyoming political action committee or to a candidate’s campaign committee shall file an itemized statement of contributions and expenditures at least seven (7) days but not more than fourteen (14) days before any primary, general or special election. Any contribution received or expenditure made after the statement has been filed, through the day of the election, whether a primary, general or special election, shall be filed as an amendment to the statement within ten (10) days after the election;

A committee formed after an election to defray campaign expenses incurred during a previous election and any political action or candidate’s campaign committee which has not filed a statement of termination shall file an itemized statement of contributions and expenditures on December 31 of each odd-numbered year;

All candidates and committees shall continue to make the reports required under this subsection until the committee terminates and the candidate or committee files a statement of termination with the appropriate filing officer. A statement of termination may be filed upon retirement of all debts;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 1, § 2.

All reports required by subsection (b) of this section shall be signed by both the chairman and treasurer. The reports shall set forth the full and complete record of contributions including cash, goods or services and actual and promised expenditures. The date of each contribution of one hundred dollars ($100.00) or more, any expenditure or obligation, the name of the person from whom received or to whom paid and the purpose of each expenditure or obligation shall be listed. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require the disclosure of the names of individuals paid to circulate an initiative or referendum petition. All contributions under one hundred dollars ($100.00) shall be reported but need not be itemized. Should the accumulation of contributions from a person exceed the one hundred dollar ($100.00) threshold, all contributions from that person shall be itemized. If the contributions, expenditures or obligations were for more than one (1) candidate, the amounts attributable to each shall be itemized separately.

The chairman of each political party central committee for the state or county, or an officer of the party designated by him, shall file an itemized statement of contributions of one hundred dollars ($100.00) or more, and any expenditures and obligations. The statement shall be filed within ten (10) days after a general or special election. The statement shall report all contributions, expenditures and obligations relating to campaign expenses, including normal operating expenses. All contributions under one hundred dollars ($100.00) shall be reported but need not be itemized. Should the accumulation of contributions from a person exceed the one hundred dollar ($100.00) threshold, all contributions from that person shall be itemized. It shall attribute all campaign contributions, expenses and obligations to a specific candidate only if the campaign contributions, expenses and obligations can be specifically identified to that specific candidate to the exclusion of other candidates on the ticket. A copy of the statement shall be furnished to each candidate identified in the statement within ten (10) days after the general or special election.

If inaccuracies are found in a statement filed in accordance with this section or additional contributions or expenditures become known after filing an amendment as required by paragraph (a)(i), (b)(i) or (h)(ii) of this section, amendments to the original statements or additional statements shall be filed within a reasonable time not to exceed thirty (30) days from the time the inaccuracies or additional contributions or expenditures became known. For purposes of this subsection, any net change less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) need not be reported.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 1, § 2.

Candidates for federal office, campaign committees for candidates for federal office and federal political action committees shall not be required to file contribution and expenditure reports under this section if the candidate or the committee is required to comply with federal election law reporting requirements.

An organization that expends in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) in any primary, general or special election to cause an independent expenditure or electioneering communication to be made shall file an itemized statement of contributions and expenditures with the appropriate filing office under W.S.

22-25-107

. The statement shall:

Identify the organization causing the electioneering communication or independent expenditure to be made and the individual acting on behalf of the organization causing the communication or expenditure to be made, if applicable;

Be filed at least seven (7) days but not more than fourteen (14) days before any primary, general or special election. Any contribution received or expenditure made after the statement has been filed, through the day of the election, whether a primary, general or special election, shall be filed as an amendment to the statement within ten (10) days after the election;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 1, § 2.

Only list those expenditures and contributions which relate to an independent expenditure or electioneering communication;

Set forth the full and complete record of contributions which relate to an independent expenditure or electioneering communication, including cash, goods or services and actual and promised expenditures. The date of each contribution of one hundred dollars ($100.00) or more, any expenditure or obligation, the name of the person from whom received or to whom paid and the purpose of each expenditure or obligation shall be listed. All contributions under one hundred dollars ($100.00) shall be reported but need not be itemized. Should the accumulation of contributions from a person exceed the one hundred dollar ($100.00) threshold, all contributions from that person shall be itemized;

Be signed by both the chairman and treasurer of the organization, if those positions are present in the organization, or by the organization’s designee.

If a candidate has formed a candidate’s campaign committee, the committee may file reports required by this section on behalf of the candidate if the candidate provides a signed document one (1) time each election cycle authorizing the committee to file reports on behalf of the candidate and attesting that the facts provided in the report are accurate. If a committee has filed a required report on behalf of a candidate under this subsection, the candidate shall not be required to separately file the report provided that the candidate shall remain individually responsible for any deficiencies in a report filed by the committee.

Reports or statements filed under this section shall be filed under penalty of perjury.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-389.6; Laws 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1993, ch. 49, § 1; ch. 201, § 2; 1995, ch. 134, § 1; 1996, ch. 105, § 2; 1997, ch. 96, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2000, ch. 66, § 1; ch. 67, §§ 1, 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2003, ch. 67, § 1; 2004, ch. 94, § 2; 2011, ch. 74, § 1; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 86, § 1, effective March 2, 2015; 2019 ch. 1, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 81, § 1, effective April 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b)(i), inserted “primary” following “ten (10) days after a.”

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2011 amendment,

in (b)(i), inserted “any organization making an independent expenditure under W.S. 22-25-102(k)”; and added (h).

Laws 2011, ch. 74 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2011.

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment, by ch. 76 § 1, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “contributions” and variants for “receipts” and variants throughout the section; in (b)(i), substituted “formed under the law” for “formed under federal law or the law”; in (b)(ii), deleted “has previously filed a statement of receipts and expenditures and” preceding “has not filed”; and made related changes.

The second 2015 amendment, by ch. 86 § 1, in the introductory paragraph in (a), substituted “subsections (g) and (j)” for “subsection (g);” and added (j).

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in the beginning of (a)(i), inserted “whether successful or not,” substituted “an” for “a fully” preceding “itemized statement,” inserted “and expenditures” following “contributions,” inserted “but not more than fourteen (14) days” following “seven (7) days,” and substituted “Any contribution received or expenditure made after the statement has been filed, through the day of the election, whether a primary, general or special election, shall be filed as an amendment to the statement within ten (10) days after” for “with information required by this subsection current to any day from the eighth day up to the fourteenth day before”; in (a)(iv), deleted “except by total with a reference to the statement” at the end; in (b), deleted “contributions and statements of” following “itemized statements of”; in (b)(i), deleted “any organization making an independent expenditure under W.S. 22-25-102(k), and any other organization supporting or opposing any ballot proposition” following “a candidate's campaign committee” and substituted “and expenditures at least seven (7) days but not more than fourteen (14) days before any primary, general or special election. Any contribution received or expenditure made after the statement has been filed, through the day of the election, whether a primary, general or special election, shall be filed as an amendment to the statement within ten (10) days after the” for “at least seven (7) days before the election current to any day from the eighth day up to the fourteenth day before the election and shall also file a statement of contributions and expenditures within ten (10) days after a primary, general or special” at the end; in (e), the amendments made numerous stylistic changes; rewrote the introductory language in (h), which read: “In addition to any other report required by this section, an organization required by W.S. 22-25-110(c) to report expenditures shall report as follows”; rewrote (h)(i), which read: “The report shall identify the organization making the expenditure and the individual acting on behalf of the organization in making the expenditure”; rewrote (h)(ii), which read: “The report shall be filed at least seven (7) days before the next primary, general or special election with information current to any day from the eighth day up to the fourteenth day before the election”; added (h)(iv) and (h)(v); substituted “reports” for “statements” or variants in (a), (a)(iv), (c); substituted “a person” for “an individual” or variants in (a)(iv), (c), (d); substituted “one hundred dollars ($100.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” in (a)(iv), (c), (d); and deleted “except for statements of contributions required under paragraph (i) of this subsection, of” in first sentence of (a)(iv) and second sentence of (c).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 1, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (a)(ii), which read: “Every candidate, whether successful or not, shall file a fully itemized statement of contributions and expenditures within ten (10) days after any general or special election”; repealed former (a)(iii), which read: “Every candidate in any primary election shall file a fully itemized statement of contributions and expenditures within ten (10) days after the primary election”; repealed former (b)(iv), which read: “In addition to the reports required under paragraphs (i) through (iii) of this subsection, a political action committee formed for the support of or opposition to any initiative or referendum petition drive or any organization supporting or opposing a petition drive shall file an itemized statement of contributions and expenditures within ten (10) days after the petition is submitted to the secretary of state pursuant to W.S.

22-24-115

”; repealed former (f), which read: “In addition to the statement of contributions and expenditures required by subsection (b) of this section, any political action committee formed for the support of any initiative or referendum petition drive or any organization supporting an initiative or referendum petition drive shall file with the secretary of state, at least thirty (30) days but no more than forty-five (45) days before the election at which the initiative or referendum proposition will be voted on, a statement signed by both the chairman and treasurer showing: (i) The total amount expended to circulate the petition; (ii) The number of persons paid to circulate the petition; and (iii) Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 67, § 2. (iv) The period of time during which signatures on the petition were obtained”; and repealed former (h)(iii), which read: “If not previously reported, the report shall include the disclosure of any source of funding to the organization in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) to further the expenditure.”

The third 2019 amendment, by ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(iv), substituted “W.S.

22-24-315

or

22-24-412

” for “W.S.

22-24-115

.”

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2022 amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, by ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2022, deleted “, which expends any funds in any primary, general or special election” preceding “shall file” in the first sentence of (b)(i).

The second 2022 amendment, by ch. 81, § 1, effective April 1, 2022, substituted “entity” for “organization” in the second sentence of (a)(iv); substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00)” in the introductory language of (h); substituted “organization's designee” for “person who caused the independent expenditure or electioneering communication to be made” in (h)(vi); and added (k).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Corporate Expression in Wyoming Ballot Issues, Referenda and Initiatives: A Political and Legal Dilemma,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 449 (1979).

§ 22-25-107.
Where reports to be filed.

All reports required under this chapter shall be filed as follows:

Any candidate for a municipal, county, judicial, school or college board office and any political action committee or candidate’s campaign committee supporting such a candidate and any political action committee or organization supporting or opposing a municipal initiative or referendum or ballot proposition within the county, or any organization that causes an independent expenditure or electioneering communication to be made within the county, shall file with the county clerk;

Any candidate for a state legislative or district judgeship office and any political action committee or candidate’s campaign committee supporting or opposing such a candidate, shall file with the secretary of state;

Any candidate for statewide office shall file with the secretary of state;

A county party central committee shall file with the secretary of state;

A state party central committee shall file with the secretary of state;

Precinct committeemen and precinct committeewomen elected at the primary election shall not be required to file a statement of contributions and expenditures;

Any political action committee or organization supporting or opposing any statewide initiative or referendum petition drive, any statewide ballot proposition or any candidate for statewide office and any organization causing an electioneering communication or an independent expenditure to be made and filing pursuant to W.S. 22-25-106(b)(i) or (h) shall file reports required by this section with the secretary of state.

Reports required to be filed at least seven (7) days before any primary, general or special election shall be filed electronically.

Any reports required under this chapter to be filed with:

The secretary of state, shall be filed electronically as provided under W.S.

9-2-2501

;

A county clerk, may be filed electronically if the board of county commissioners has adopted rules consistent with the requirements of W.S.

9-2-2501

which allow for electronic filing.

Whenever “county clerk” is used in this chapter, it means the county clerk of the county in which the person resides.

The secretary of state shall maintain a searchable database of reports filed pursuant to this chapter available to the public on or through the Internet as defined in W.S. 9-2-3219(a)(iii). The secretary of state shall be responsible for the provision of training and instruction for filers on how to access and use the campaign finance electronic filing system. The training shall be for the purpose of educating filers about use of the system, and is not intended to assist filers with filing their reports.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-389.7; Laws 1981, ch. 159, § 1; 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1992, ch. 1, § 5; 1993, ch. 201, § 2; 1997, ch. 96, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2003, ch. 67, § 1; 2004, ch. 94, § 2; 2008, ch. 64, § 1; 2011, ch. 74, § 1; 2013 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 81, § 1, effective April 1, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), inserted “primary” following “required to be filed after any.”

Laws 2004, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2008 amendment,

deleted “and county clerk” at the end of (a)(iv); in (b) added “Until December 31, 2009,” at the beginning of the first and second sentences, and added the last sentence; substituted “shall” for “may” following “secretary of state,” in (c)(i); and added (e).

Laws 2008, ch. 64, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

in (a)(vii), inserted “and any organization making an independent expenditure under W.S. 22-25-102(k) and filing pursuant to W.S. 22-25-106(b)(i) or (h).”

Laws 2011, ch. 74 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2011.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (b).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(vi), substituted “contributions” for “receipts.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(vii), substituted "causing an electioneering communication or" for "making" following "any organization," substituted "to be made" for "under W.S. 22-25-102(k)" following "independent expenditure"; near end of (b), deleted "and statements required to be filed after any primary, general or special election"; at end of (c)(i), deleted "if the secretary of state has adopted rules which allow for the electronic filing"; in (e), substituted "The" for "After December 31, 2009," substituted "as defined in W.S. 9-2-1035(a)(iii)" for "the World Wide Web or a similar proprietary or common carrier electronic system"; and substituted "reports" for "statements" in (a), (a)(vii), (b), and (c).

The 2021 amendment

substituted “9-2-3219(a)(iii)” for “9-2-1035(a)(iii)” in the first sentence of (e).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The 2022 amendment,

effective April 1, 2022, in (a)(i), added “or organization” preceding “supporting or opposing” and added “or any organization that causes an independent expenditure or electioneering communication to be made within the county,”.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Ousting the Judge: Campaign Politics in the 1984 Wyoming Judicial Retention Elections,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 371 (1989).

§ 22-25-108.
Failure of persons to file reports; notice; penalties; reconsideration.

Any person required to file a report under W.S.

22-25-106

shall be given notice prior to an election, by the appropriate filing office specified under W.S.

22-25-107

, that failure to file the report within the time required by that section shall subject the person to civil penalties as provided in subsection (f) of this section. The notice shall inform any candidate’s campaign committee, organization, political party or political action committee that the officers responsible for filing the report shall be subject to the same civil penalties as the candidate’s campaign committee, organization, political party or political action committee for failure to file the report.

Any person who fails to file a report under W.S.

22-25-106

within the time required by that section shall have their name printed on a list drafted by the appropriate filing office. The filing office shall:

Immediately post the list in the filing office and make the list available to the public;

Notify the person at their address of record that the person has twenty-one (21) days from the date the notice was sent to comply with W.S.

22-25-106

or be subject to civil penalties as provided in subsection (f) of this section.

through (e) Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 40, § 2.

The appropriate filing office or the county attorney, for reports required to be filed with the county clerk, shall issue a final order imposing the civil penalty specified in this subsection against any person failing to comply with W.S.

22-25-106

twenty-one (21) days from the date the notice was sent under subsection (b) of this section. The final order shall be sent to the person at their address of record and shall notify the person of the right to request reconsideration of the order as provided in subsection (h) of this section. The filing office or county attorney shall impose the following civil penalty in the final order after giving due consideration to the willfulness of the failure to file, the person’s level of experience with reporting requirements under this act, efforts made to obscure the identity of the person required to file and any other factor evidencing an intent to evade reporting requirements under this act:

Up to five hundred dollars ($500.00) per day beginning on the date of the final order and ending when the report is filed for a failure to file a report with the secretary of state;

Up to two hundred dollars ($200.00) per day beginning on the date of the final order and ending when the report is filed for a failure to file a report with the county clerk.

Any candidate required to file a report under W.S.

22-25-106

who authorizes the candidate’s campaign committee to file on their behalf as provided by W.S.

22-25-106

(j) shall be jointly and severally liable with the candidate’s campaign committee for any civil penalty imposed under this section.

Any person may, within twenty (20) days of the date of a final order issued pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, request reconsideration of the order and submit documentation to the appropriate filing office or county attorney showing good cause for a failure to file a report. The filing office or county attorney may, after a decision finding good cause, waive any civil penalty imposed under this section provided that the person files the report within the time specified in the decision. A decision to not waive an imposed penalty by the secretary of state is subject to the contested case procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. A decision to not waive an imposed penalty by the county attorney is appealable to a circuit court of appropriate jurisdiction.

A civil penalty imposed under this section shall be paid within thirty (30) days of the date of the final order issued pursuant to subsection (f) of this section or the date of a decision denying reconsideration by the appropriate filing office or county attorney, whichever is later. Any penalty not paid within the time required by this subsection is delinquent and shall bear interest at a rate of eighteen percent (18%) per annum until paid or collected, provided that no penalty is due and no interest shall accrue during any period in which the penalty is being reviewed by a court or during the pendency of a contested case proceeding. The filing office for the state shall notify the attorney general of a delinquent civil penalty.

A delinquent civil penalty may be recovered in an action brought in the name of the state of Wyoming in any court of appropriate jurisdiction. In addition to any other remedy provided by law for the recovery of the penalty and any interest thereon, the county attorney or the attorney general, as appropriate, may recover any costs or damages relating to the recovery effort including attorney’s fees. No filing fee shall be charged for the filing of an action under this subsection nor shall a fee be charged for service of process.

Civil penalties and any interest thereon shall be paid to the clerk of court with jurisdiction over the matter for deposit to the public school fund of the county in which the fine was assessed. Any recovered costs or damages relating to the recovery effort shall be retained by the county or the state, as appropriate.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-389.8; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1995, ch. 134, § 1; 1997, ch. 96, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2003, ch. 67, § 1; 2005, ch. 100, § 1; 2013 ch. 189, § 1, effective January 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 40, §§ 1, 2, effective May 1, 2018; 2022 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 81, § 1, effective April 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to filling of vacancies generally, see §§

22-18-101

to

22-18-112

.

As to civil penalty for violations, see §

22-25-102

.

As to offenses and penalties, see §§

22-26-101

to

22-26-121

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a), which formerly provided that failure to file could result in vacancy in nomination or a vacancy in office, not receiving a certificate of nomination or election, not entering office, and charging the candidate with a misdemeanor; in (b), deleted the last sentence, which read: “The candidate may be charged with a misdemeanor as provided by W.S.

22-26-112

”; in (c), substituted “statement required by W.S.

22-25-106

within thirty (30) days” for “statement required by subsection (a) of this section within one (1) month” and in (c)(i) substituted “or” for “and”; and added (e).

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2015, added “if required pursuant to W.S.

22-25-107

” in (a); substituted “is convicted of failure to file” for “fails to file” in (c); and in (d), added “and each candidate’s campaign committee” in the first sentence, and in the last sentence, added “or candidate’s campaign committee” and substituted “misdemeanor” for “felony” and “one (1) year” for two (2) years.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “contributions” for “receipts” in (a) and (b).

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 40, § 1, effective May 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “Any person required to file a report under W.S.

22-25-106

shall” for “Candidates shall,” inserted “by the appropriate filing office specified under W.S.

22-25-107

,” substituted “required by that section shall” for “required, a full and complete itemized statement of contributions if required pursuant to W.S.

22-25-107

and a statement of contributions and expenditures shall,” and added the last sentence; in (b), substituted “Any person who” for “A candidate who” at the beginning and “to file a report under W.S.

22-25-106

within the time required by that section shall have” for “to file the statement of contributions required by the seventh day before the election shall have”; added (b)(ii); added (f) through (m); and made stylistic changes.

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 40, § 2, effective May 1, 2018, repealed former (c) through (e).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2022 amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, by ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2022, in (f)(i), added “Up to” at the beginning, added “per day beginning on the date of the final order and ending when the report is filed,” and made a related change.

The second 2022 amendment, by ch. 81, § 1, effective April 1, 2022, added “after giving due consideration to the willfulness of the failure to file, the person's level of experience with reporting requirements under this act, efforts made to obscure the identity of the person required to file and any other factor evidencing an intent to evade reporting requirements under this act” in the last sentence of the introductory language of (f); in (f)(i) and (f)(ii), added “Up to” and “per day beginning on the date of the final order and ending when the report is filed”; and made related changes.

§ 22-25-109.
Reporting candidates in violation. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-389.9; Laws 1981 Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2003, ch. 67, § 1; 2008, ch. 64, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 40, § 2, effective May 1, 2018.

§ 22-25-110.
Campaign advertising in communications media.

It is unlawful for a candidate, political action committee, organization, including organizations causing an electioneering communication or an independent expenditure to be made, candidate’s campaign committee, or any political party central committee to pay for campaign literature or campaign advertising without conspicuously displaying or speaking the following disclosure: “paid for by (name of candidate, organization or committee sponsoring the campaign literature or campaign advertising)”. The disclosure set forth in this subsection shall be required in the following forms of campaign literature or campaign advertising:

Printed campaign literature or campaign advertising including mailers, pamphlets, brochures, periodicals or billboards;

Campaign advertising appearing on the radio or distributed through a telephone or cellular system or other solely auditory medium;

Campaign advertising appearing on television;

Paid placement of campaign advertising on the internet or other electronic communication network. This paragraph shall not apply when including the disclosure is impracticable due to size and text limitations in electronic campaign advertising, provided that the campaign advertising shall include a hyperlink to an internet website containing the disclosure.

For purposes of this section, “campaign literature or campaign advertising” does not include small campaign items such as tickets, bumper stickers, pens, pencils, buttons, rulers, nail files, balloons and yard signs displaying the name of the candidate or office sought and any other items specified by rule of the secretary of state.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 1, § 2.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-389.10; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1996, ch. 93, § 1; 2001, ch. 116, § 1; 2011, ch. 74, § 1; 2019 ch. 1, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2011 amendment,

in (a), inserted “including organizations making expenditures pursuant to W.S. 22-25-102(k)”; and added (c).

Laws 2011, ch. 74 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2011.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 1, §
1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted "causing an electioneering communication or an independent expenditure to be made" for "making expenditures pursuant to W.S. 22-25-102(k)," substituted "without conspicuously displaying or speaking the following disclosure: "paid for by (name of candidate, organization or committee sponsoring the campaign literature or campaign advertising)". The disclosure set forth in this subsection shall be required in the following forms of campaign literature or campaign advertising:" for "in any communication medium without printing or announcing the candidate, organization or committee sponsoring the campaign advertising or campaign literature. The communications media in using the campaign advertising shall print or announce the name of the candidate, organization or committee paying for the advertising." at the end; added (a)(i) through (a)(iv); in (b), inserted "or campaign advertising: following "campaign literature" and inserted "and any other items specified by rule of the secretary of state" at the end.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 1, §
2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (c) which read: "Any organization making an expenditure pursuant to W.S. 22-25-102(k) which is subject to this subsection and in excess of five hundred dollars ($500.00) shall report the expenditure as specified in W.S. 22-25-106(h)."

While neither amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 22-25-111.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1980, ch. 31, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 1, related to notice to advertising media.

§ 22-25-112.
Campaign advertising rates.

Rates charged for political campaign advertising shall not be higher than rates charged for local advertising of the same quality and quantity.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-389.12.

§ 22-25-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 1, provided that statements filed under the chapter were public records.

§ 22-25-114.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 186, § 1, related to the penalties for violating §§

22-25-101

through

22-25-115

.

§ 22-25-115.
Written campaign advertising; prohibiting placement on public property; exception.

Except as provided herein, written campaign advertising shall not be placed on or attached to any real or personal property of the state or its political subdivisions. This prohibition shall not apply to fairgrounds of the Wyoming state fair or of any county fair organized under the laws of this state. The University of Wyoming, any community college and school district may permit such advertising subject to regulation by their governing board as to time, place and manner. Any rules and regulations adopted shall provide for equal access to opposing political views. Subject to the approval of the landowner and any rules and regulations adopted by a municipality, campaign materials may be placed on municipal street rights-of-way. The department of transportation shall allow campaign materials to be placed on a state right-of-way within a municipality to the same extent which the municipality allows campaign materials to be placed on municipal street rights-of-way. Nothing in this section shall apply to any interstate highway.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 133, § 1; 1995, ch. 37, § 1; 1999, ch. 65, § 1.